Arkansas, session 2025, HB1257.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 17-97-401(a) and (b), concerning
technicians employed by psychologists, are amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) A technician may be employed by a licensed psychologist in the
practice of neuropsychology or a healthcare facility.
(2)(A) An individual employed as a technician may be employed
only in neuropsychological testing and shall be restricted to the
administration and scoring of standardized objective tests shall only
practice under the supervision of a licensed psychologist in the following
areas:
(i) Administration and scoring of standardized
objective psychological tests with specific predetermined and manualized
procedures;
(ii) Manualized cognitive intervention services; and
*JMB032*
03-18-2025 14:05:51 JMB032

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 S3/18/25 HB1257
(iii) Administration of fitness-to-proceed
examinations under § 5-2-301 et seq.
(B) An individual employed as a technician may shall not:
administer or score projective tests
(i) Select tests;
(ii) Conduct intake assessments;
(iii) Conduct clinical interviews including without
limitation patient interviews and collateral interviews of relatives, friends
of the patient, or other professionals associated with the patient;
(iv) Interpret patient data;
(v) Communicate test results or treatment
recommendations to patients; or
(vi) Administer tests in educational institutions.
(b)(1) A technician shall have a bachelor's degree from a regionally
an accredited institution, preferably with a major in psychology approved by
the Arkansas Psychology Board.
(2) The basic educational background of a technician shall
include passing grades from instruction in:
(A) Abnormal psychology;
(B) Personality;
(C) Psychological statistics; and
(D) Psychological testing.
(3) As used in this subsection, “passing grade” means:
(A) “C” in a letter grading system;
(B) “Pass” in a pass/fail system; or
(C) “Satisfactory” in a satisfactory/unsatisfactory
grading system.
(4) A technician who has completed a degree with a nonpsychology
major shall have completed course work with passing grades in the subject
matter areas listed in subdivision (b)(2) of this section.
(5)(A)(2)(A) A technician who does not have this academic
background and the academic background under subdivision (b)(1) of this
section and who is currently employed by a psychologist shall be provided
with specific information to supplement his or her training in
neuropsychological psychological test administration.
(B) Any A technician employed by a psychologist in the
03-18-2025 14:05:51 JMB032

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 S3/18/25 HB1257
future shall be required to shall meet the academic background specified in
this section.

SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 17-97-402(a), concerning additional
training for technicians employed by psychologists, is amended to read as
follows:
(a) The supervising psychologist shall make the technician aware:
(1) Of the goals of neuropsychological examination and his or
her specific role in achieving those goals;
(2) Through additional training, if necessary, of appropriate
institutional emergency procedures to deal with various medical emergencies
such as heart attack, respiratory arrest, and seizures and of other relevant
information; and
(3)(2) In addition to medical emergencies, of recommended
procedures for dealing with incompetent or adjudicated patients who attempt
to leave the testing setting without authorization.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 17-97-402(d), concerning additional
training of a technician employed by a psychologist, is amended to add an
additional subdivision to read as follows:
(4) The supervising psychologist shall provide eighty (80) hours
of documented training in the following areas:
(A) A minimum of four (4) hours of professional ethics,
confidentiality, mandatory reporting, best practices in objective test
administration, and scoring;
(B) A minimum of sixteen (16) hours in the study of test
manuals;
(C) A minimum of twenty (20) hours of direct observation
of test administration and scoring by a licensed psychologist; and
(D) A minimum of forty (40) hours of administering and
scoring tests under the direct supervision of a licensed psychologist.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 17-97-402(g)(1), concerning additional
training for technicians employed by psychologists, is amended to read as
follows:
(g)(1) The supervising psychologist shall ensure that each technician
03-18-2025 14:05:51 JMB032

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 S3/18/25 HB1257
employed by the psychologist has an explicit understanding of the limited
nature of the technician's role in neuropsychological psychological
examination.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 17-97-403, concerning registration of
technicians employed by a licensed psychologist, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(c) The board may require an annual registration fee of ten dollars
($10.00).

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 17-97-405(a)(1), concerning the supervision
of technicians employed by psychologists, is amended to read as follows:
(a)(1) An acceptable employment setting for a technician provides
shall provide ongoing neuropsychological psychological services or scientific
research in a well-defined and established program.

SECTION 7. Arkansas Code § 17-97-405(c), concerning the supervision of
technicians employed by psychologists, is amended to read as follows:
(c) The setting shall include a licensed, Arkansas Psychology Board-
approved psychologist who is legally and ethically responsible for the
oversight of the integrity and quality of the services as well as other
resources necessary to meet the employment needs of the technician whose
technical assistance is restricted to the practice of neuropsychology
psychology and research.

SECTION 8. Arkansas Code § 17-97-405, concerning the supervision of
technicians employed by psychologists, is amended to add an additional
subsection to read as follows:
(g) A supervising psychologist shall not supervise more than four (4)
full-time technicians at one (1) time.

SECTION 9. Arkansas Code § 17-97-406(a), concerning the qualifications
of supervisors for technicians employed by psychologists, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) A supervising psychologist shall be:
(1) Licensed to practice psychology in Arkansas;
03-18-2025 14:05:51 JMB032

As Engrossed: H2/19/25 S3/18/25 HB1257
(2) Aware of and abide by the ethical principles and state
statutes pertaining to the practice of psychology in general and to
supervision in particular; and
(3) Approved by the Arkansas Psychology Board to practice
neuropsychology psychology.

SECTION 10. Arkansas Code § 17-97-406(d)(1), concerning the
qualifications of supervisors for technicians employed by psychologists, is
amended to read as follows:
(d)(1) A supervising psychologist shall have adequate training,
knowledge, and skill to render competently any neuropsychological service
which be licensed to practice psychological assessment services in the areas
in which the employed technician undertakes.

SECTION 11. Arkansas Code Title 17, Chapter 97, Subchapter 4, is
amended to add an additional section to read as follows:
17-97-407. Reimbursement — Definition.
(a) As used in this section, “health benefit plan” means a plan,
policy, contract, certificate, agreement, or other evidence of coverage for
healthcare services offered or issued by a healthcare insurer in this state.
(b) A psychologist shall be reimbursed for services provided by a
technician for the administration and scoring of psychological testing by:
(1) The Arkansas Medicaid Program; or
(2) A health benefit plan.

/s/L. Johnson










03-18-2025 14:05:51 JMB032